Maine, session 132, LD1809.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 23 MRSA §1973, sub-§4, ¶C is enacted to read:
C. The authority shall impose a toll surcharge of $1 on any noncommercial passenger
vehicle not registered in this State, in addition to any toll such a vehicle is required to
pay. All toll surcharges collected pursuant to this paragraph must be deposited in the
Highway Fund.
Sec. 2. 29-A MRSA §501, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Electric vehicles. In addition to any other fee imposed pursuant to this section,
the annual fee for a battery electric vehicle is $200 and the annual fee for a plug-in hybrid
electric vehicle is $100. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, all fees
collected pursuant to this subsection must be deposited in the Highway Fund.
As used in this subsection, "battery electric vehicle" has the same meaning as in Title 35-A,
section 10126, subsection 1, paragraph A, and "plug-in hybrid electric vehicle" has the
same meaning as in Title 35-A, section 10126, subsection 1, paragraph D.
Sec. 3. 36 MRSA §1766 is enacted to read:
§1766. Delivery fee
A person required to register as a seller pursuant to section 1754-B, including a
marketplace facilitator or marketplace seller, is required to impose and collect a delivery
fee as required by this section.
1. Persons subject. A person who buys and has delivered, either by the seller or
through the use of a 3rd party, at least $100 of tangible personal property that is subject to
sales tax pursuant to section 1811 is required to pay a delivery fee of 50 cents per delivery.
For purposes of this subsection, a delivery fee must be imposed for each separate delivery.
2. Collection and remittance. A delivery fee required pursuant to this section must
be imposed by the seller at the time of sale on the buyer and remitted by the seller in the
same manner and at the same time as the sales tax collected on that purchase. The seller
shall indicate on the monthly report filed pursuant to section 1951-A, subsection 1 the total
amount of delivery fees collected.
3. Not taxable. A delivery fee imposed pursuant to this section is not subject to sales
tax.
4. Revenue from delivery fee. The assessor shall remit all delivery fee revenue
collected pursuant to subsection 2 to the Highway Fund.